District of Columbia statutes.
6-406

Appropriations.

The appropriation available for opening alleys and minor streets in the District of Columbia is hereby made available for the purpose of establishing building lines as provided for in this chapter.

History

June 21, 1906, 34 Stat. 385, ch. 3505, § 5

Cross References

New streets and alleys, scope of Mayor’s authority, see § 9-203.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-206.
1973 Ed., § 5-206.